Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-174.02
Zoning resolution; regulations.

The zoning resolution shall be adopted and amended, and regulations made and promulgated not inconsistent therewith, in the manner provided in sections 23-114, 23-114.03, 23-164, and 23-165.

Laws 1961, c. 87, § 2, p. 300;

Laws 1967, c. 117, § 16, p. 377.